New York, session 2025-2026, A10840.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision 1 of section 2-112 of 2 the election law, as added by chapter 42 of the laws of 2019, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) Every state committee shall meet no earlier than September seven- 5 teenth and no later than October first following the June primary. 6 Until such organization meeting, the officers of the existing state 7 committee shall exercise all legal authority. Upon the conclusion of 8 such organization meeting, the officers of the new state committee shall 9 assume all legal authority vested in the previously organized state 10 committee. 11 (b) Every county committee shall meet no earlier than September seven- 12 teenth and no later than October sixth following the June primary. 13 Until such organization meeting, the officers of the existing county 14 committee shall exercise all legal authority. Upon the conclusion of 15 such organization meeting, the officers of the new county committee 16 shall assume all legal authority vested in the previously organized 17 county committee. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14923-01-6